North Carolina, session 2025, SB234.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of six hundred ninety thousand dollars ($690,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the City of
Greenville to acquire a new fire truck.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S234-v-1*